apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="consen/tir__vblex">
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l>                <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l>                <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>taient</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tais</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tais</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tait</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tant</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tant</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l>               <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l>               <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tent</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tent</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tez</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tez</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>tez</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l>               <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tie</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ties</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiez</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiez</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tions</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tions</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tir</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tira</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirai</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiraient</l>         <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirais</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirais</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirait</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiras</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirent</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirez</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiriez</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirions</l>          <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirons</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiront</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tisse</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tissent</l>          <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tisses</l>           <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tissiez</l>          <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tissions</l>         <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tit</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tons</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tons</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>tons</l>             <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tîmes</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tît</l>              <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tîtes</l>            <r>tir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="consentir">                      <i>consen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="démentir" a="webform">           <i>démen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="départir">                       <i>dépar</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mentir" a="webform">             <i>men</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="partir">                         <i>par</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pressentir" a="eleka">           <i>pressen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pressentir">                     <i>pressen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repartir">                       <i>repar</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ressentir">                      <i>ressen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ressortir" a="eleka">            <i>ressor</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sentir">                         <i>sen</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sortir">                         <i>sor</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sortir de ses gonds" a="webform"><i>sor</i><par n="consen/tir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>ses<b/>gonds</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>ses<b/>gonds</g></r></p></e>
